Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2010.02
Child abuse and neglect; investigator; qualifications; duties.

The Nebraska State Patrol shall provide immediate responses to inquiries from local law enforcement in rural areas of the state regarding proper investigatory procedures related to child abuse and neglect. All calls shall be referred to an investigator of the Nebraska State Patrol who has completed training and is knowledgeable in:

(1) Screening child abuse and neglect calls;

(2) Interviewing alleged child abuse and neglect victims at the appropriate developmental level necessary;

(3) Family dynamics, including the ability to assess and handle child abuse and neglect and child sexual abuse cases;

(4) Understanding the medical evidence and other physical evidence in child abuse and neglect and child sexual abuse cases and how to gather such evidence;

(5) How to prepare evidence for prosecution; and

(6) Evaluating the potential for false allegations.

The investigator shall maintain and make available to local law enforcement a list of psychiatrists, psychologists, mental health practitioners, or other qualified professionals in the particular area where the incident occurred.

Laws 1996, LB 842, § 2.